test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AY_STEM_2.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_AY_STEM_2 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_AY_STEM_2

     ñáy+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: ñáayaa
     ñáy+V+INDIRECT+PAST: ñáayaan
     ñáy+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: ñáayaas
     ñáy+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: ñáayaa.ang
     ñáy+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: ñáay'ahlanggang
     ñáy+V+CERTAIN+PAST: ñáay'ahlanggan
     ñáy+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: ñáay'ahlanggiinii
     ñáy+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: ñáay'ahlans
     ñáy+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: ñáayaa'ahlang
     ñáy+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: ñáayaa'ahlanggaa
     ñáy+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: ñáayaa'ahlanggang
     ñáy+V+REFLEXIVE: ñáay'ahl
